Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0315.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 Sec. 11a. (1) Beginning on July 1, 1996, each school district formerly organized as a primary school district or as a school district of the fourth class, third class, or second class shall be is a general powers school district under this act. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) Beginning on July 1, 1996, a school district operating under a special or local act shall operate as a general powers school district under this act except to the extent that the special or local act is inconsistent with this act. Upon repeal of a special or local act that governs a school district, that school district shall become becomes a general powers school district under this act. (3) A general powers school district has all of the rights, powers, and duties expressly stated in this act; may exercise a power implied or incident to a power expressly stated in this act; and, except as otherwise provided by law, may exercise a power incidental or appropriate to the performance of a function related to operation of a public school and the provision of public education services in the interests of public elementary and secondary education in the school district, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Educating pupils. In addition to educating pupils in grades K-12, K to 12, this function may include operation of preschool, lifelong education, adult education, community education, training, enrichment, and recreation programs for other persons. A school district may do either or both of the following: (i) Educate pupils by directly operating 1 or more public schools on its own. (ii) Cause public education services to be provided for pupils of the school district through an agreement, contract, or other cooperative agreement with another public entity, including, but not limited to, another school district or an intermediate school district. (b) Providing for the safety and welfare of pupils while at 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 school or a school sponsored activity or while en route to or from school or a school sponsored activity. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, acquiring, constructing, maintaining, repairing, renovating, disposing of, or conveying school property, facilities, equipment, technology, or furnishings. (d) Hiring, contracting for, scheduling, supervising, or terminating employees, independent contractors, and others, including, but not limited to, another school district or an intermediate school district, to carry out school district powers. A school district may indemnify its employees. (e) Receiving, accounting for, investing, or expending public school money; borrowing money and pledging public school funds for repayment; and qualifying for state school aid and other public or private money from local, regional, state, or federal sources. (f) Acquiring, erecting, constructing, designing, planning, furnishing, equipping, maintaining, repairing, renovating, disposing of, or conveying buildings, facilities, or property for the purpose of housing public school employees. (4) A general powers school district may enter into agreements, contracts, or other cooperative arrangements with other entities, public or private, including, but not limited to, another school district or an intermediate school district, or join organizations as part of performing the functions of the school district. An agreement, contract, or other cooperative arrangement that is entered into under this act is not required to comply with the provisions of the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, as provided under section 503 of that act, MCL 124.503. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (5) A general powers school district is a body corporate and shall be is governed by a school board. An act of a school board is not valid unless approved, at a meeting of the school board, by a majority vote of the members lawfully serving on the board. (6) The board of a general powers school district shall adopt bylaws. These bylaws may establish or change board procedures, the number of board officers, titles and duties of board officers, and any other matter related to effective and efficient functioning of the board. Regular meetings of the board shall must be held at least once each month, at the time and place fixed by the bylaws. Special meetings may be called and held in the manner and for the purposes specified in the bylaws. Board procedures, bylaws, and policies in effect on the effective date of this section shall continue in effect until changed by action of the board. (7) The board of a school district shall must be elected as provided under this act and the Michigan election law. The number of members of the board of a general powers school district shall must remain the same as for that school district before July 1, 1996 unless changed by the school electors of the school district at a regular or special school election. A ballot question for changing the number of board members may be placed on the ballot by action of the board or by petition submitted by school electors as provided under chapter XIV of the Michigan election law, MCL 168.301 to 168.316. (8) Members of the board of a general powers school district shall must be elected by the school electors for terms of 4 or 6 years, as provided by the school district's bylaws. At each regular school election, members of the board shall must be elected to fill the positions of those whose terms will expire. A term of office 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 begins as provided in section 302 of the Michigan election law, MCL 168.302, and continues until a successor is elected and qualified. (9) Except as provided under part 5b, a community district shall must be organized and conducted in the same manner as a general powers school district. As provided under part 5b, a community district has all of the powers of a general powers school district under section 11a and has all additional powers granted by law to a community district or the school board of a community district. The members of the board of a community district shall be are elected by the school electors in the manner and for the terms as provided under part 5b and the Michigan election law. (10) The board of a general powers school district may submit to the school electors of the school district a question that is within the scope of the powers of the school electors and that the board considers proper for the management of the school system or the advancement of education in the school district. Upon the adoption of a question by the board, the board shall submit the question to the school electors by complying with section 312 of the Michigan election law, MCL 168.312. (11) A special election may be called by the board of a general powers school district as provided under chapter XIV of the Michigan election law, MCL 168.301 to 168.316. (12) Unless expressly provided in 1995 PA 289, the powers of a school board or school district are not diminished by this section or by 1995 PA 289. (13) A school district operating a public library, public museum, or community recreational facility as of July 1, 1996 may continue to operate the public library, public museum, or community recreational facility. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (14) A school district may establish and administer scholarships for its students or graduates to support their attendance at a postsecondary educational institution from funds the school district receives as a result of a compact entered into between this state and a federally recognized Indian tribe pursuant to the Indian gaming regulatory act, Public Law 100-497. A school district that establishes a scholarship program funded under this subsection shall ensure that the scholarship program provides for all of the following: (a) That a student or graduate is not eligible to be awarded a scholarship unless the student or graduate is enrolled in the school district for all of grades 9 to 12 and meets 1 of the following: (i) Is a resident of the school district for all of grades 9 to 12. (ii) Was enrolled in the school district for the 2009-2010 school year but was not a resident of the school district for that school year, and is enrolled in the school district continuously after that school year until graduation. (b) That the amount of a scholarship awarded to a student or graduate who was not enrolled in and a continuous resident of the school district for all of grades K to 12 shall must be adjusted based on length of enrollment and continuous residency or, for a student or graduate described in subdivision (a)(ii), based on length of enrollment. Sec. 1141. (1) The property of a school district is exempt from taxation, provisions of other acts to the contrary notwithstanding, except that property owned by the school district that is used for private purposes for more than 2 years is not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 exempt from taxation as long as the private use continues beyond the 2-year period. Housing public school employees is not considered a private purpose for the purposes of this section. (2) School property not being utilized primarily for public school purposes and from which income is being derived or which is being held out for income purposes at the time of final confirmation of special assessment rolls by the governing body of a city, village, or township shall be is liable to the city, village, or township for special assessments attributable to the property. The property shall continue continues to be liable for the special assessment for a period not longer than 2 years after the property is put to a public school use. The board of a school district may enter into an agreement with a county or county agency, city, village, or township to pay special assessments for local improvements levied against school property irrespective of the use to which the property is put. (3) Property owned, acquired, or otherwise used by a school district or intermediate school district for the purpose of housing public school employees is exempt from taxation and special assessments, provisions of other acts to the contrary notwithstanding. Sec. 1212. (1) If approved by the school electors of the school district, the board of a school district may levy a tax on the taxable value of the real and personal property of the school district each year for the purpose of creating a sinking fund. All of the following apply to a sinking fund tax authorized under this section: (a) For a sinking fund tax authorized before March 29, 2017, the sinking fund tax may be used for the purchase of real estate 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for sites for, and the construction or repair of, school buildings. For a sinking fund tax authorized on or after March 29, 2017 and before the effective date of the amendatory act that added the following sentence, August 6, 2023, the sinking fund tax may be used for the purchase of real estate for sites for, and the construction or repair of, school buildings, for school security improvements, or for the acquisition or upgrading of technology. For a sinking fund tax authorized on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, August 6, 2023, the sinking fund tax may be used for the purchase of real estate for sites for, and the construction or repair of, school buildings; for school security improvements; for the acquisition or upgrading of technology; for the acquisition of student transportation vehicles; for the acquisition of parts, supplies, and equipment used for the maintenance of student transportation vehicles; for the acquisition of trucks and vans registered under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, and used to carry parts, equipment, and personnel for or in the maintenance of school buildings, ; or for the acquisition of parts, supplies, and equipment used to maintain those trucks and vans. (b) For a sinking fund tax authorized before March 29, 2017, the sinking fund tax must not exceed 5 mills. For a sinking fund tax authorized on or after March 29, 2017, the sinking fund tax must not exceed 3 mills. (c) For a sinking fund tax authorized before March 29, 2017, the sinking fund tax may be levied each year for a period not to exceed 20 years. For a sinking fund tax authorized on or after March 29, 2017, the sinking fund tax may be levied each year for a period not to exceed 10 years. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) For a sinking fund tax authorized on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, the sinking fund tax may be used for the purchase of real estate for sites for, and the construction or repair of, school buildings; for school security improvements; for the acquisition or upgrading of technology; for the acquisition of student transportation vehicles; for the acquisition of parts, supplies, and equipment used for the maintenance of student transportation vehicles; for the acquisition of trucks and vans registered under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, and used to carry parts, equipment, and personnel for, or in the maintenance of, school buildings, or for the acquisition of parts, supplies, and equipment used to maintain those trucks and vans; for the purchase of real estate for sites for, and the construction or repair of, buildings and facilities that are used to house public school employees, and for the acquisition of equipment and furnishings for buildings and facilities that are used to house public school employees. (e) (d) The sinking fund tax levy is subject to the 15 mill tax limitation provisions of section 6 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 and the property tax limitation act, 1933 PA 62, MCL 211.201 to 211.217a. (2) A school district that levies a sinking fund tax under this section must have an independent audit of its sinking fund conducted annually, including a review of the uses of the sinking fund, and shall submit the audit report to the department of treasury. If the department of treasury determines from the audit report that the sinking fund has been used for a purpose other than those authorized for the sinking fund under this section, the school district shall repay the misused funds to the sinking fund 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 from the school district's operating funds and shall not levy a sinking fund tax under this section after the date the department of treasury makes that determination. (3) A school district shall submit the proposition of levying a sinking fund tax to the school electors of the school district at a regular or special school election. (4) The question of levying taxes for the purpose of creating a sinking fund must be by ballot in substantially the following form: "Shall ________________________________ levy _______ mills (legal name of school district) to create a sinking fund for the purpose of ____________________ ________________________________________________________________ for a period of _____ years? Yes ( ) No ( )". (5) For the purposes of this section, millage approved by the school electors before December 1, 1993 for which the authorization has not expired is considered to be approved by the school electors. (6) As used in this section: (a) "School security improvement" means any capital improvement or purchase that is designed to act as a deterrent to unauthorized entry of persons or items onto school premises or to otherwise promote security, including, but not limited to, metal detectors, locks, doors, lighting, cameras, and enhancements to entryways. School security improvement also includes a mobile telephone application that provides the ability to communicate with personnel on site while also connecting an emergency telephone call 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to a 9-1-1 center. School security improvement does not include personnel costs or operation costs related to a capital improvement or purchase or related to a mobile telephone application. (b) "Technology" means that term as defined in section 1351a. Sec. 1351a. (1) Beginning with bonds issued after May 1, 1994, a school district, including, but not limited to, a school district that is a community district or a qualifying school district, shall not borrow money and issue bonds of the district under section 1351(1). However, a school district, including, but not limited to, a school district that is a community district, may borrow money and issue bonds of the district to defray all or a part of the cost of purchasing, erecting, completing, remodeling, or equipping or reequipping, except for equipping or reequipping for technology, school buildings, including library buildings, structures, athletic fields, playgrounds, or other facilities, or parts of or additions to those facilities; furnishing or refurnishing new or remodeled school buildings; acquiring, preparing, developing, or improving sites, or parts of or additions to sites, for school buildings, including library buildings, structures, athletic fields, playgrounds, or other facilities; purchasing school buses; acquiring, installing, or equipping or reequipping school buildings for technology; acquiring, erecting, furnishing, equipping, preparing, or developing property, buildings, and facilities used to house public school employees; or accomplishing a combination of the purposes set forth in this subsection. Section 1351(2) to (4) applies to bonds issued under this section. (2) The proceeds of bonds issued under this section or under section 11i of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1611i, shall must be used for capital expenditures and to pay costs of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 bond issuance, and shall must not be used for maintenance costs. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a school district that issues bonds under this section or under section 11i of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1611i, shall have an independent audit, using generally accepted accounting principles, of its bonding activities under these sections conducted within 120 days after completion of all projects financed by the proceeds of the bonds and shall submit the audit report to the department of treasury. For bonds issued under section 11i of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1611i, the independent audit required under this subsection may be conducted and submitted with the annual report required under the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. (3) A school district, including, but not limited to, a school district that is a community district, shall not borrow money and issue notes or bonds under this section to defray all or part of the costs of any of the following: (a) Upgrades to operating system or application software. (b) Media, including diskettes, compact discs, video tapes, and disks, unless used for the storage of initial operating system software or customized application software included in the definition of technology under this section. (c) Training, consulting, maintenance, service contracts, software upgrades, troubleshooting, or software support. (4) A resident of a school district, including, but not limited to, a school district that is a community district, has standing to bring suit against the school district to enforce the provisions of this section in a court having jurisdiction. (5) As used in this section, "technology" means any of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 following: (a) Hardware and communication devices that transmit, receive, or compute information for pupil instructional purposes. (b) The initial purchase of operating system software or customized application software, or both, accompanying the purchase of hardware and communication devices under subdivision (a). (c) The costs of design and installation of the hardware, communication devices, and initial operating system software or customized application software authorized under this subsection.